Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Licensing of Mortgage Lenders, Mortgage Loan Brokers and Mortgage Loan Servicers

45-13-201. License required — Exceptions.

No person shall act as a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan servicer in this state without first obtaining a license under this chapter. Except in the case of sale of real property as provided in subsection (b), no contractor or home improvement contractor or other person who supplies materials and renders services in the improvement of real property shall engage in the business of making residential mortgage loans or of being a mortgage loan servicer or mortgage loan broker in this state.

The requirement of a license under subsection (a) and this chapter do not apply to any of the following, except as provided in subdivision (b)(2):

Any depository institution;

Any subsidiary of a depository institution that is owned and controlled by the depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency;

Any institution regulated by the farm credit administration;

Any individual who makes a residential mortgage loan to, or offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan with or on behalf of, an immediate family member of the individual;

An individual who makes a residential mortgage loan, or simply offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan, when the loan is secured by a dwelling that served as the individual's residence;

A licensed attorney performing activities that do not require licensure under the guidelines set forth in 12 CFR part 1008, appendix D;

Any person, or person under the control of another person who, as seller, receives or makes in any consecutive twelve-month period five (5) or fewer residential mortgage loans and who does not hold themselves out to the public as being in the residential mortgage lending business;

No person shall be exempt from subsection (a) and this chapter pursuant to this subdivision (b)(1)(G) if such person makes more than five (5) residential mortgage loans in a consecutive twelve-month period whether such person makes such loans themselves or through another person over whom such person has control;

Any person, or person under the control of a person, who makes a mortgage loan to an employee of such person as an employment benefit, employment incentive, or relocation package;

Any person, or person under the control of a person, doing any act related to mortgage loans pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction;

A person that performs only real estate brokerage activities, as defined in § 45-13-105, and is licensed pursuant to the Tennessee Real Estate Broker License Act of 1973, compiled in title 62, chapter 13. Such person is permitted to communicate and include in any contract any mortgage terms agreed upon by the parties for the real property being financed without being required to be licensed under this chapter, so long as the communication does not include the offering or negotiating of any terms of a residential mortgage loan; and

A person that performs land title insurance services in connection with a closing of a sale transaction and is licensed pursuant to title 56, chapter 6 and the rules of the department of commerce and insurance compiled at chapter 0780-1-56. Such person is permitted to communicate and include in any closing documents any mortgage terms agreed upon by the parties for the real property being financed without being required to be licensed under this chapter, so long as the communication does not include the offering or negotiating of any terms of a residential mortgage loan.

This subsection (b) does not exempt a person from licensure as a mortgage loan originator if the United States department of housing and urban development or its duly designated successor has expressly determined that the person is subject to licensure as a mortgage loan originator as the term is defined in the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.).

The requirement of a license to act as a mortgage lender under subsection (a) and the requirements of this chapter pertaining to mortgage lenders, unless otherwise stated, do not apply to any registrant making residential mortgage loans that is authorized to do so under the Industrial Loan and Thrift Companies Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title; provided, however, that all mortgage loan originators of the registrant must be licensed under part 3 of this chapter.

The commissioner shall be authorized to exempt in whole or in part from the requirements of this chapter additional entities or classes of entities, not including individuals, that the commissioner finds inappropriate to include to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, so long as the exemption is compliant with and does not impede the purposes of the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.).

Upon approval or consent by the United States department of housing and urban development, the commissioner shall be authorized to exempt in whole or in part from this chapter additional individuals or classes of individuals, such as those working for bona fide nonprofit corporations and government agencies, that the commissioner finds inappropriate to include to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8; 2011, ch. 228, § 1; 2013, ch. 104, §§ 1-4.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Acts 2011, ch. 228, § 2 provided that the secretary of state is directed to deliver a copy of the act, which amended subsections (a), (b) and (d), to the appropriate division of the United States department of housing and urban development having responsibility for administering the Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008, compiled in 12 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

Attorney General Opinions. An individual investment property owner who provides a purchaser with financing that qualifies as a “residential mortgage loan” must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-201, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. Additionally, such an individual who provides such financing for compensation or gain or in the expectation thereof must be licensed under T.C.A. §§45-13-301, et seq., unless a statutory exception applies. OAG 10-93, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (8/24/10).

45-13-202. Application for license.

The application for a license under § 45-13-201(a) shall be in writing, under oath and in the form prescribed by the commissioner and shall contain the following:

The name and principal business address in this state of the applicant, the principal business address, if any, outside of this state of the applicant and all addresses within this state at which the applicant is conducting or intends to conduct business;

If the applicant is other than a corporation, the form of the legal entity, such as sole proprietorship, general partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, trust or other legal entity, and the name and address, as applicable, of the sole proprietor, general partner or partners, joint venturer, grantor or other principal, as may be defined by and required by the commissioner;

If the applicant is a corporation, the name and address of each executive officer and each director, the registered agent for service of process and each stockholder owning or controlling through voting trust or other agreement ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding capital stock of the corporation;

Whether the applicant seeks licensure as a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker, mortgage loan servicer or any combination of mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and mortgage loan servicer; and

Other information that the commissioner may reasonably request pertaining to the activities of the applicant as a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker or mortgage loan servicer.

As a condition of licensure under this section, the commissioner may by rule require that each individual who is an officer, partner, managing member, managing principal or branch manager, or possesses control of the applicant as defined in § 45-13-105, or any other individual associated with the applicant as is reasonably necessary to meet the purposes of this chapter, successfully complete prelicensure testing or education courses, or both, approved by the commissioner. This subsection (b) shall not apply to renewals of existing licenses.

The commissioner is authorized to require an applicant for a license under § 45-13-201(a) to consent to a criminal history records check and to provide with the application fingerprints in a form acceptable to the commissioner. The commissioner may require the consent and fingerprints from any individual who is an officer, partner, managing member, managing principal, branch manager or ultimate equitable owner of ten percent (10%) or more of the applicant, as well as from any other individual associated with the applicant as is reasonably necessary to meet the purposes of this chapter. No application shall be deemed complete until the consent and fingerprints have been submitted, and the refusal of any person to consent to a criminal history records check or to provide fingerprints as allowed by this subsection (c) constitutes grounds for the commissioner to deny licensure to the applicant.

Any criminal history records check conducted under subsection (c) shall be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, or both, and the results of the criminal history records check shall be forwarded to the commissioner. The reasonable costs incurred in conducting the criminal history records check shall be paid by the applicant, in addition to any other fees required by this section.

Notwithstanding § 45-13-502 or any other provision in this chapter, the commissioner shall not use a multi-state automated licensing system to share federal bureau of investigation criminal history background information of any individual other than mortgage loan originators, unless authorized to do so by the federal Secure and Fair Enforcement for Mortgage Licensing Act of 2008 (12 U.S.C. §§ 5101 — 5116), as amended, or other federal law.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8; 2014, ch. 736, § 7; 2016, ch. 745, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-203. Licensing — Posting — Renewal — Abatement of fees — Biennial license fees.

Upon the filing of a complete application for licensure as a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and/or mortgage loan servicer and the payment of all applicable fees, the commissioner shall investigate each application to the extent deemed necessary. The commissioner shall deliver a license to the applicant if the commissioner finds that the applicant, including its principals:

Has the financial responsibility, experience and character to warrant the belief that the business of the applicant will be operated lawfully and within the purposes of this chapter;

That the applicant has a tangible net worth (tangible assets less liabilities) of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and an additional tangible net worth of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each additional branch office within this state; and

Has paid a nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i).

If the commissioner does not find that the applicant and principals have met the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(C), the commissioner shall deny the application and notify the applicant of the denial, give notice of the grounds for the denial and notify the applicant of the right to request a hearing. If the commissioner denies an application or if the commissioner fails to act on an application within ninety (90) days after the filing of a properly completed application, the applicant may make written demand to the commissioner for a hearing on the question of whether the license should be granted. The commissioner shall notify the applicant of the date when the application is deemed complete. Nothing contained in this subdivision (a)(2) shall prohibit an applicant from modifying or amending the application in order to seek approval by the commissioner. If the commissioner denies any application and if the applicant requests a hearing, the commissioner shall conduct the hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5; provided, that the applicant has requested the hearing in writing within thirty (30) days following the denial of the application by the commissioner. At the hearing, the burden of proving that the applicant is entitled to a license is on the applicant.

Each license shall be conspicuously posted in the respective place of business of the licensee for which the license was issued.

On or before December 31 of each year, a person holding a license issued under this part shall pay a nonrefundable supervision fee, as provided in § 45-1-118(i), to the commissioner for the following year, commencing January 1, together with such renewal application as the commissioner may require, including the surety bond adjusted in accordance with § 45-13-204. Failure to timely pay the supervision fee or to timely submit a completed renewal application shall cause the license to expire at the close of business on December 31.

As a condition of licensure renewal, the commissioner may by rule establish continuing education requirements for each of the individuals identified in § 45-13-202(b). The rules for prelicensure and continuing education requirements under this part may include criteria for content, accreditation of sponsors and programs, computation of credit, special cases and exemptions, general compliance procedures and sanctions for noncompliance.

A licensee making timely and proper application for renewal of its license shall be permitted to continue to operate under its existing license until its application is approved or denied. Should the commissioner deny the renewal application, the licensee may make written demand to the commissioner for a hearing on the question of whether the license should be renewed; provided, that the request for hearing be received by the commissioner within thirty (30) days from the date of denial; and provided, further, that the failure to timely request a hearing shall cause the license to be automatically revoked without further notice or hearing at the end of the thirty-day period. If a hearing is timely requested under this subdivision (c)(3), it shall be conducted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, and the license shall not expire until resolution of the appeal in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

No abatement of the supervision fee shall be made if the license is surrendered, cancelled, revoked or suspended prior to the expiration of the period for which it was issued.

The commissioner may require education and testing providers of any of the educational courses or tests required under this chapter to file information regarding the contents and materials of the proposed courses or tests with the commissioner for review or approval, or both. The commissioner may set fees for the initial and continuing review of courses and tests.

The commissioner may establish a biennial license arrangement for the filing of the application for licensure renewal, but in no case shall the supervision fee be payable for more than one (1) year at a time.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8; 2014, ch. 736, §§ 8-10.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-204. Surety bond required.

At the time of filing an application for a license under § 45-13-201(a), the applicant shall also file with the commissioner a surety bond payable to the state, in a form to be approved by the commissioner, for the benefit of any person injured by the wrongful act, default, fraud or misrepresentation of the licensee. The bond must be issued by a bonding company qualified to do business in this state.

For mortgage loan servicers, the surety bond shall be maintained in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

For mortgage lenders and mortgage loan brokers, the surety bond shall provide coverage for each mortgage loan originator in an amount in accordance with subsection (d); provided, however, that for the first calendar year of licensing in this state, or for calendar years 2009 and 2010, or both, as applicable, the surety bond for mortgage lenders shall be in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), and the surety bond for mortgage loan brokers shall be in the amount of ninety thousand dollars ($90,000).

The penal sum of the surety bond of any mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall be maintained in an amount that reflects the dollar amount of loans originated, as determined by the commissioner.

The bond shall be maintained for not less than twenty-four (24) months following the expiration, revocation, suspension or surrender of the license.

Immediately upon recovery upon any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond to fulfill the requirements of this section.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-205. Change of address or officers — Annual report including past officers and directors.

Each licensed mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and mortgage loan servicer shall notify the commissioner five (5) days prior to any change in its principal place of business.

Each licensed mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and mortgage loan servicer shall notify the commissioner in writing within fourteen (14) days of any change of its president, chief executive officer, treasurer or chief financial officer or among the general partners or partners.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to real estate brokers, OAG 90-33, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/16/90).

45-13-206. Records and financial statements — Deposits and periodic payments — Disclosure.

Every licensed mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and mortgage loan servicer shall keep and maintain at all times in its principal place of business correct and complete records of all residential mortgage loan transactions arranged by the licensee.

The financial statements furnished to the commissioner by each licensed mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and mortgage loan servicer shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied.

If a deposit is required in connection with an application for a residential mortgage loan, there shall be a written agreement, signed by the parties, pertaining to the disposition of the deposit, whether the loan is finally consummated or not, and the term for which the agreement is to remain in force before return of the deposit for nonperformance can be required. A licensee who receives deposits shall preserve and on request make available to the commissioner all information related to the deposits. The licensee shall further preserve all agreements between the parties involved in the transaction and all contracts, agreements and instructions pertaining to the transaction.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-207. Preservation of records — Reproduction — Maintenance location.

All books and records required to be preserved by any regulation of the commissioner or required by any federal statute, regulation or regulatory guideline, as applicable to each licensed mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker and mortgage loan servicer, shall be preserved and made available to the commissioner, as provided in this chapter, for the time that the commissioner may by rule or regulation require, not to exceed twenty-five (25) months on all rejected applications and not to exceed twenty-four (24) months on loans paid in full. The licensee may cause any or all records at any time in its custody to be reproduced or preserved by itself or by any other person who agrees in writing to submit its operations to the examination of the commissioner to the extent that the operations directly affect the recordkeeping, by any microphotographic process, electronic or mechanical data storage technique or any other means. Any record reproduced or preserved by those processes, techniques or means shall have the same force and effect as the original record and be admitted into evidence equally with the original.

Any licensee, after receiving the prior written approval of the commissioner, may maintain records at any location within or outside of the state.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-208. Minimum information.

The commissioner may prescribe by rules and regulations the minimum information to be shown in the books, accounts and records of each licensee, so that the books, accounts and records will enable the commissioner to determine compliance with this chapter and with the rules and regulations lawfully made under this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8; 2017, ch. 122, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-209. Statement of account.

Upon written request from the mortgagor, the holder of a residential mortgage loan shall deliver to the mortgagor, within fourteen (14) days from receipt of the written request, a statement of the mortgagor's account showing the date and amount of all payments credited to the account within the previous twelve-month period and the total unpaid balance. Not more than two (2) statements shall be required in any twelve-month period. If the holder of a residential mortgage loan forwards to the mortgagor an annual payment and escrow analysis, or other such analysis, the submission of the analysis to the mortgagor shall constitute a statement of the mortgagor's account.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-210. Change of control.

A change in control of a person licensed as a mortgage lender, mortgage loan broker, and/or mortgage loan servicer under this chapter shall require thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the commissioner. In the case of a publicly traded corporation, notification shall be made in writing within thirty (30) days of a change or acquisition of control of a licensee.

Upon notification of a change in control, the commissioner may require information deemed necessary to determine whether an application for a license is required. The commissioner may waive the filing of an application if, in the commissioner's discretion, the change in control does not pose any risk to the interests of the public.

Whenever control is acquired or exercised in violation of this section, the license shall be deemed revoked as of the date of the unlawful acquisition of control. The licensee, or its controlling person, shall surrender the license to the commissioner on demand.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.

45-13-211. Managing principals and branch managers.

Each mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker licensed under this chapter shall have a managing principal who operates the business under that person's full charge, control and supervision. Each principal and branch office of a mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall have a manager. The mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall have the responsibility of ensuring that the manager has sufficient experience in the mortgage lending industry to operate the business of the mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker lawfully. The managing principal for a mortgage lender's or mortgage loan broker's business may also serve as the branch manager of one (1) of the mortgage lender's or mortgage loan broker's branch offices. Any individual mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker who operates a sole proprietorship shall be considered a managing principal for purposes of this chapter.

Each mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall file a form as prescribed by the commissioner indicating the business's designation of managing principal and branch manager for each branch and each individual's acceptance of the responsibility.

Each mortgage lender or mortgage loan broker shall notify the commissioner in writing within fourteen (14) business days of any change in its managing principal or branch manager designated for each branch.

Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§45-13-101—45-13-129 (Acts 1988, ch. 846, §§ 1-18; 1990, ch. 788, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 629, § 1; 2001, ch. 165, §§ 10-20; 2003, ch. 141, §§ 1-3; 2004, ch. 747, §§ 1-10; 2005, ch. 463, § 1; 2008, ch. 821, §§ 1-3, 5-9), concerning the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act of 1988, was repealed and replaced by the Tennessee Residential Lending, Brokerage and Servicing Act by Acts 2009, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 31, 2009. See this chapter for current provisions.